scrapedcsv2yaml/yaml_output/VTI_?.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup
     
Tests:

  Lemma - ALL :

     adima'+VTI+Ind+Pos: nindadima'aan
     adima'+VTI+Ind+Pos: odadima'aan
     adima'+VTI+Ind+Pos: adima'ang
     adima'+VTI+Ind+Pos: edima'ang
     adima'+VTI+Ind+Pos: adima'an
